apertium-bel.bel.dix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>АБВГДЕЁЖЗІЙКЛМНОПРСТУЎФХЦЧШЫЬЭЮЯабвгдеёжзійклмнопрстуўфхцчшыьэюя</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"       c="Noun/Назоўнік"/>
    <sdef n="pr"      c="Preposition/Прыназоўнік"/>
    <sdef n="prn"     c="Pronoun/Займеннік"/>
    <sdef n="det"     c="Determiner/Дэтэрмінант"/>
    <sdef n="np"      c="Proper noun/Імя ўласнае"/>
    <sdef n="adv"     c="Adverb/Прыслоўе"/>
    <sdef n="adj"     c="Adjective/Прыметнік"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"   c="Verb/Дзеяслоў"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"     c="Verb 'to be'"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"   c=""/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"  c="Coordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"  c="Adverbial conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="abbr"       c="Abbreviation"/>
    <sdef n="ij"      c=""/>
    <sdef n="part"      c=""/>
    <sdef n="slasher"      c=""/>
    <sdef n="pprep"      c=""/>
    <sdef n="neg"      c=""/>

    <sdef n="m"       c="Masculine/Мужчынскі род"/>
    <sdef n="f"       c="Feminine/Жаночы род"/>
    <sdef n="nt"      c="Neuter/Ніякі род"/>

    <sdef n="nn"      c="Inanimate"/>
    <sdef n="aa"      c="Animate"/>
    <sdef n="an"      c="Animate / inanimate"/>
    <sdef n="num"     c="Numeral"/>
    <sdef n="sp"      c="Singular / plural"/>
    <sdef n="sg"      c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"      c="Plural"/>

    <sdef n="nom"     c="Nominative/Назоўны склон"/>
    <sdef n="acc"     c="Accusative/Вінавальны склон"/>
    <sdef n="gen"     c="Genitive/Родны склон"/>
    <sdef n="dat"     c="Dative/Давальны склон"/>
    <sdef n="ins"     c="Instrumental/Творны склон"/>
    <sdef n="loc"     c="Prepositional/Месны склон"/>

    <sdef n="sint"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="short"   c=""/>

    <sdef n="impf"    c="Imperfective"/>
    <sdef n="perf"    c="Perfective"/>

    <sdef n="tv"      c="Transitive"/>
    <sdef n="iv"      c="Intransitive"/>

    <sdef n="pers"    c="Personal"/>
    <sdef n="ref"    c="Reflexive"/>
    <sdef n="itg"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="rel"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="ind"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="ord"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="pos"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="dem"    c="Demonstrative"/>

    <sdef n="top"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="ant"    c=""/>

    <sdef n="inf"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="fut"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="past"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="pres"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="imp"    c=""/>

    <sdef n="pprs"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="pp"    c=""/>

    <sdef n="sup"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="comp"    c=""/>

    <sdef n="p1"      c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"      c="Second person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"      c="Third person"/>

    <sdef n="mf"      c="Masculine / feminine"/>
    <sdef n="mfn"      c="Masculine / feminine / neuter"/>

    <sdef n="cm"         c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="sent"       c="Sentence marker"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"       c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"       c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="lquot"      c="Left quote"/>
    <sdef n="rquot"      c="Right quote"/>
    <sdef n="guio"       c="Hyphen"/>

  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <!-- SECTION: Punctuation -->

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)? ?%</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><i>-</i><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?%?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?[:.][0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="guio">
      <e><re>[—\-]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">
      <e><re>,</re><p><l></l><r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">
      <e><re>[.\?;:!]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="quotes">
      <e><re>[«]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lquot"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[»]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rquot"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e><re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e><re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Conjunctions -->

    <pardef n="і__cnjcoo">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="бо__cnjsub">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="cnjsub"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Particles -->
    <pardef n="ці__part">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="part"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Prepositions -->

    <pardef n="скрозь__pr">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="pr"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="без__pr">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="pr"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="к__pr">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="pr"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="за__pr">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="pr"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="пры__pr">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="pr"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/к__pr">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>к</l><r>к<s n="pr"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ка</l><r>к<s n="pr"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>к</l><r>к<s n="pr"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/перад__pr">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>перад</l><r>перад<s n="pr"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>перада</l><r>перад<s n="pr"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>перад</l><r>перад<s n="pr"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/над__pr">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>над</l><r>над<s n="pr"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>нада</l><r>над<s n="pr"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>над</l><r>над<s n="pr"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/пад__pr">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>пад</l><r>пад<s n="pr"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>пада</l><r>пад<s n="pr"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>пад</l><r>пад<s n="pr"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>

      <e r="LR"><p><l>пад</l><r>пад<s n="pr"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>пада</l><r>пад<s n="pr"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>пад</l><r>пад<s n="pr"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/аб__pr">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>аб</l><r>аб<s n="pr"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>аба</l><r>аб<s n="pr"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>аб</l><r>аб<s n="pr"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>

      <e r="LR"><p><l>аб</l><r>аб<s n="pr"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>аба</l><r>аб<s n="pr"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>аб</l><r>аб<s n="pr"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/у__pr">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>у</l><r>у<s n="pr"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ў</l><r>у<s n="pr"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ва</l><r>у<s n="pr"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>у</l><r>у<s n="pr"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>

      <e r="LR"><p><l>у</l><r>у<s n="pr"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ў</l><r>у<s n="pr"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ва</l><r>у<s n="pr"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>у</l><r>у<s n="pr"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>

      <e r="LR"><p><l>у</l><r>у<s n="pr"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ў</l><r>у<s n="pr"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ва</l><r>у<s n="pr"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>у</l><r>у<s n="pr"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="і"><i>і</i><par n="і__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="а"><i>а</i><par n="і__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="аднак"><i>аднак</i><par n="і__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="але"><i>але</i><par n="і__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ды"><i>ды</i><par n="і__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ці"><i>ці</i><par n="і__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="таксама"><i>таксама</i><par n="і__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="то"><i>то</i><par n="і__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="або"><i>або</i><par n="і__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="бо"><i>бо</i><par n="бо__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="каб"><i>каб</i><par n="бо__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="хоць"><i>хоць</i><par n="бо__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="ці"><i>ці</i><par n="ці__part"/></e>
    <e lm="вось"><i>вось</i><par n="ці__part"/></e>
    <e lm="небудзь" a="slasher"><i>небудзь</i><par n="ці__part"/></e>
    <e lm="аб"><i></i><par n="/аб__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="у"><i></i><par n="/у__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="к"><i></i><par n="/к__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="перад"><i></i><par n="/перад__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="над"><i></i><par n="/над__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="пад"><i></i><par n="/пад__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="за"><i>за</i><par n="скрозь__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="на"><i>на</i><par n="скрозь__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="па"><i>па</i><par n="скрозь__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="паўз"><i>паўз</i><par n="скрозь__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="пра"><i>пра</i><par n="скрозь__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="праз"><i>праз</i><par n="скрозь__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="скрозь"><i>скрозь</i><par n="скрозь__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="цераз"><i>цераз</i><par n="скрозь__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ад"><i>ад</i><par n="без__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="акрамя"><i>акрамя</i><par n="без__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="апрача"><i>апрача</i><par n="без__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="без"><i>без</i><par n="без__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="вакол"><i>вакол</i><par n="без__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="воддаль"><i>воддаль</i><par n="без__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="да"><i>да</i><par n="без__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="да"><i>да</i><par n="к__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="дзеля"><i>дзеля</i><par n="без__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="для"><i>для</i><par n="без__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="замест"><i>замест</i><par n="без__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="звыш"><i>звыш</i><par n="без__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="каля"><i>каля</i><par n="без__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="між"><i>між</i><par n="без__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="паводле"><i>паводле</i><par n="без__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="паміж"><i>паміж</i><par n="без__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="супраць"><i>супраць</i><par n="без__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="сярод"><i>сярод</i><par n="без__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="па"><i>па</i><par n="к__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="за"><i>за</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="між"><i>між</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="паміж"><i>паміж</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="на"><i>на</i><par n="пры__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="па"><i>па</i><par n="пры__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="пры"><i>пры</i><par n="пры__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="пасля"><i>пасля</i><par n="без__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="насупраць"><i>насупраць</i><par n="без__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="унутры"><i>унутры</i><par n="без__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="з-за"><i>з-за</i><par n="без__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="от"><i>от</i><par n="без__pr"/></e>
    <e><par n="coma"/></e>
    <e><par n="separa"/></e>
    <e><par n="guio"/></e>
    <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
    <e><par n="paresq"/></e>
    <e><par n="pardret"/></e>
    <e><par n="quotes"/></e>
